District of Columbia statutes.
44-301.09

Assessment of insurers.

The Mayor shall assess all insurers to cover all the costs of administering this chapter. The Mayor shall promulgate regulations to determine the assessment formula.

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-274, § 109, 46 DCR 1294

History

1981 Ed., § 32-571.9.

Prior Codifications

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 12-274, the “Health Benefits Plan Members Bill of Rights Act of 1998”, see Mayor’s Order 99-159, October 13, 1999 ( 46 DCR 8842).

Delegation of Authority